Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-302.04
Detasseling; employer; requirements.

(1) An employer who employs a child under sixteen years of age in detasseling shall provide at least two supervisors who are eighteen years of age or older at each location where detasseling is being performed by a child under sixteen years of age. The supervisors shall be capable of assisting with issues of health, safety, and wages, including bonuses and incentive payments.

(2) An employer who employs a child under sixteen years of age in detasseling shall provide the parents of such child with an information sheet defining the terms of employment, including, but not limited to, the availability of water and sanitary facilities on the job and wage, bonus, and incentive payment information. The information sheet shall set forth the name, address, and telephone number of the Division of Safety and Labor Standards of the Department of Labor for purposes of filing complaints concerning nonpayment of wages.

Laws 2001, LB 180, § 2.